vi: Loại bánh quy: Anzac; Biscotti (cantuccini); Bánh quy brownie; Bơ; Sô-cô-la chip; Sừng bò; Bánh quy tiêu hóa; Florentine; May mắn; Bánh quy gừng; Lợi sữa; Linzer; Maamoul; Macaron; Macaroon; Mật đường; Bánh trung thu; Yến mạch; Bơ đậu phộng; Protein; Bánh nướng giòn; Sablé; Bánh quy kẹp; Bánh bơ giòn; Snickerdoodle; Quả cầu tuyết; Spritz; Đường; Bánh quy in dấu tay; Bánh xốp; Khác
da: Småkagevarianter: Anzac; Biscotti (cantuccini); Brownie-småkage; Smør; Chocolate chip; Halvmåne; Digestive; Florentiner; Lykkekage; Honningkage; Ammesmåkage; Linzer; Maamoul; Macaron; Makron; Melasse; Månekage; Havregryn; Peanutbutter; Protein; Tvebak; Sablé; Sandwich; Shortbread; Snickerdoodle; Snowball; Sprøjtebakkelse; Sukker; Thumbprint; Vaffel; Anden
fr: Variété de biscuit: Anzac; Biscotti (cantuccini); Biscuit brownie; Au beurre; Pépites de chocolat; Croissant; Digestif; Florentin; Fortune; Pain d'épices; Allaitement; Linzer; Maamoul; Macaron; Macaron à la noix de coco; Mélasse; Gâteau de lune; Flocons d'avoine; Beurre de cacahuète; Protéiné; Biscotte; Sablé; Sandwich; Sablé écossais; Snickerdoodle; Boule de neige; Spritz; Sucre; À empreinte; Gaufrette; Autre
nb: Kjeksvariasjon: Anzac; Biscotti (cantuccini); Browniekjeks; Smør; Sjokoladebiter; Halvmåne; Digestive; Florentiner; Lykke; Pepperkake; Amme; Linzer; Maamoul; Makron; Kokosmakron; Melasse; Månekake; Havregryn; Peanøttsmør; Protein; Kavring; Sablé; Sandwich; Shortbread; Snickerdoodle; Snøball; Spritz; Sukker; Tommelavtrykk; Vaffelkjeks; Annet
lt-LT: Sausainių rūšis: ANZAC; „Biscotti“ („Cantuccini“); „Brownie“ sausainis; Sviestiniai; Su šokolado gabaliukais; Pusmėnulio formos; „Digestive“; Florentinai; Laimės; Imbieriniai; Laktaciją skatinantys; Lincerio; „Maamoul“; „Macaron“; „Macaroon“; Su melasa; Mėnulio pyragėliai; Avižiniai; Su žemės riešutų sviestu; Baltyminiai; Džiūvėsėliai; „Sablé“; Sausainiai-sumuštiniai; Trapios tešlos; „Snickerdoodle“; Sniego gniūžtės; „Spritz“; Cukriniai; Su įspaudu; Vafliai; Kita
pl: Odmiana ciastek: Anzac; Biscotti (cantuccini); Brownie; Maślane; Z kawałkami czekolady; Rogaliki; Digestive; Florentynki; Z wróżbą; Pierniki; Na laktację; Linzer; Maamoul; Makaroniki; Kokosanki; Melasowe; Ciasteczka księżycowe; Owsiane; Z masłem orzechowym; Białkowe; Suchary; Sablé; Markizy; Kruche; Snickerdoodle; Kule śnieżne; Szprycowane; Cukrowe; Z wgłębieniem; Wafle; Inne
es: Variedad de galletas: Anzac; Biscotti (cantuccini); Galleta de brownie; Mantequilla; Chispas de chocolate; Media luna; Digestiva; Florentina; De la suerte; Pan de jengibre; Lactancia; Linzer; Maamoul; Macarrón; Cocada; Melaza; Pastel de luna; Avena; Mantequilla de maní; Proteína; Biscote; Sablé; Sándwich; Panecillo de mantequilla; Snickerdoodle; Bolas de nieve; Spritz; Azúcar; Con huella; Oblea; Otra
ro-RO: Varietate de fursecuri: Anzac; Biscotti (cantuccini); Fursec brownie; Cu unt; Cu fulgi de ciocolată; Cornulețe; Digestivi; Florentine; Răvașe; Turtă dulce; Pentru lactație; Linzer; Maamoul; Macaron; Pricomigdale; Cu melasă; Mooncake; Cu ovăz; Cu unt de arahide; Proteici; Pesmeți; Sablé; Sandwich; Biscuiți fragezi (shortbread); Snickerdoodle; Bulgăre de zăpadă; Șprițați; Cu zahăr; Cu amprentă (thumbprint); Napolitană; Altele
zh-CN: 曲奇种类: 澳新军团饼干; 意式脆饼 (cantuccini); 布朗尼饼干; 黄油饼干; 巧克力豆饼干; 羊角饼干; 消化饼干; 佛罗伦萨饼干; 幸运饼干; 姜饼; 催乳饼干; 林兹饼干; 玛阿穆尔; 马卡龙; 椰丝球; 糖蜜饼干; 月饼; 燕麦饼干; 花生酱饼干; 蛋白饼干; 面包干; 沙布列饼干; 夹心饼干; 酥饼; 桂皮糖曲奇; 雪球饼干; 挤花曲奇; 糖霜饼干; 拇指饼干; 威化饼干; 其他
hu: Süteményválaszték: Anzac; Biscotti (cantuccini); Brownie keksz; Vajas; Csokoládédarabos; Kifli; Korpás (Digestive); Florentin; Szerencsesüti; Mézeskalács; Tejelválasztást serkentő; Linzer; Maamoul; Macaron; Kókuszcsók (Macaroon); Melaszos; Holdsütemény; Zabpelyhes; Mogyoróvajas; Fehérjés; Kétszersült; Sablé; Szendvicskeksz; Omlós keksz (Shortbread); Snickerdoodle; Hógolyó; Kinyomós sütemény; Cukros; Ujjlenyomatos (Lekváros); Ostya; Egyéb
sk-SK: Rôzne druhy sušienok: Anzac; Biscotti (cantuccini); Brownie sušienky; Maslové; S kúskami čokolády; Rožteky; Cereálne; Florentínky; Sušienky šťastia; Perníčky; Laktačné; Linecké; Maamoul; Makrónky; Kokosky; Melasové; Mesačné koláčiky; Ovsené; S arašidovým maslom; Proteínové; Sucháre; Sablé; Zlepované; Krehké; Snickerdoodle; Snehové guľky; Striekané pečivo; Cukrové; S jamkou; Oblátky; Iné
cs: Druh sušenek: Anzac; Biscotti (cantuccini); Brownie sušenky; Máslové; S kousky čokolády; Rohlíčky; Digestive; Florentýnky; Sušenky štěstí; Perníčky; Laktační; Linecké; Maamoul; Makronky; Kokosky; Melasové; Měsíční koláče; Ovesné; Arašídové; Proteinové; Suchary; Sablé; Sendvičové; Shortbread; Snickerdoodle; Sněhové koule; Stříkané; Cukrové; Sušenky s důlkem; Oplatky; Jiné
en: Cookie variety: Anzac; Biscotti (cantuccini); Brownie cookie; Butter; Chocolate chip; Crescent; Digestive; Florentine; Fortune; Gingerbread; Lactation; Linzer; Maamoul; Macaron; Macaroon; Molasses; Mooncake; Oatmeal; Peanut butter; Protein; Rusk; Sablé; Sandwich; Shortbread; Snickerdoodle; Snowball; Spritz; Sugar; Thumbprint; Wafer; Other
zh-TW: 餅乾種類: 安扎克餅乾; 義式脆餅 (Cantuccini); 布朗尼餅乾; 奶油餅乾; 巧克力豆餅乾; 新月餅乾; 消化餅乾; 佛羅倫斯脆餅; 幸運餅乾; 薑餅; 發奶餅乾; 林茲餅乾; 曼穆爾餅乾 (Maamoul); 馬卡龍; 椰絲球; 糖蜜餅乾; 月餅; 燕麥餅乾; 花生醬餅乾; 高蛋白餅乾; 烤麵包脆片 (Rusk); 沙布蕾餅乾 (Sablé); 夾心餅乾; 奶油酥餅; 桂皮糖餅乾 (Snickerdoodle); 雪球餅乾; 擠花餅乾 (Spritz); 糖霜餅乾; 拇指印餅乾; 威化餅乾; 其他
ru: Вид печенья: Анзак; Бискотти (кантуччини); Печенье брауни; Сливочное; С шоколадной крошкой; Рогалики; Дижестивное; Флорентийское; С предсказанием; Имбирное; Для лактации; Линцерское; Маамуль; Макарон; Макарун; Из патоки (мелассовое); Лунный пряник; Овсяное; С арахисовой пастой; Протеиновое; Сухарики; Сабле; Сэндвич; Песочное; Сникердудль; Снежки; Шприц-печенье; Сахарное; С углублением (Thumbprint); Вафли; Другое
ko: 쿠키 종류: 앤잭; 비스코티(칸투치니); 브라우니 쿠키; 버터; 초콜릿 칩; 초승달; 다이제스티브; 플로랑탱; 포춘; 진저브레드; 모유 수유; 린츠; 마아물; 마카롱; 마카룬; 당밀; 월병; 오트밀; 피넛 버터; 단백질; 러스크; 사블레; 샌드위치; 쇼트브레드; 스니커두들; 스노우볼; 스프리츠; 슈가; 섬프린트; 웨이퍼; 기타
de: Kekssorte: Anzac-Kekse; Biscotti (Cantuccini); Brownie-Keks; Butterkeks; Chocolate Chip; Kipferl; Digestive; Florentiner; Glückskeks; Lebkuchen; Stillkeks; Linzer Plätzchen; Maamoul; Macaron; Makrone; Melassekeks; Mondkuchen; Haferflockenkeks; Erdnussbutterkeks; Proteinkeks; Zwieback; Sablé; Sandwich-Keks; Shortbread; Snickerdoodle; Schneeballkeks; Spritzgebäck; Zuckerkeks; Engelsaugen; Waffel; Sonstige
nl: Koekjesvariant: Anzac; Biscotti (cantuccini); Brownie-koekje; Boter; Chocolate chip; Halvemaan; Digestive; Florentine; Gelukskoekje; Gemberkoek; Lactatiekoekje; Linzer; Maamoul; Macaron; Kokosmakroon; Melasse; Maancake; Havermout; Pindakaas; Proteïne; Beschuit; Sablé; Sandwich; Shortbread; Snickerdoodle; Sneeuwbal; Sprits; Suiker; Thumbprint; Wafel; Overig
th: คุกกี้หลากหลายชนิด: แอนแซค; บิสคอตติ (แคนทุชชินี); บราวนี่คุกกี้; เนย; ช็อกโกแลตชิป; รูปพระจันทร์เสี้ยว; ไดเจสทีฟ; ฟลอเรนทีน; เสี่ยงทาย; ขนมปังขิง; เพิ่มน้ำนมแม่; ลินเซอร์; มามูส; มาการอง; มาการูน; โมลาส; ขนมไหว้พระจันทร์; ข้าวโอ๊ต; เนยถั่ว; โปรตีน; รัสก์; ซาเบล; แซนด์วิช; ชอร์ตเบรด; สนิกเกอร์ดู้ดเดิ้ล; สโนว์บอล; สปิรตซ์; น้ำตาล; ทัมบ์พรินท์; เวเฟอร์; อื่นๆ
tr: Kurabiye çeşitleri: Anzak; Biscotti (cantuccini); Brownie kurabiye; Tereyağlı; Damla çikolatalı; Ay kurabiye; Digestive; Florentine; Şans; Zencefilli; Laktasyon; Linzer; Mamul; Makaron; Macaroon; Pekmezli; Ay keki; Yulaflı; Fıstık ezmeli; Proteinli; Peksimet; Sable; Sandviç; Tereyağlı kurabiye; Snickerdoodle; Kartopu; Spritz; Şekerli; Parmak izi; Gofret; Diğer
pt-BR: Variedade de biscoito: Anzac; Biscotti (cantuccini); Biscoito de brownie; Amanteigado; Gotas de chocolate; Crescente; Digestivo; Florentino; Sorte; Gengibre; Para lactantes; Linzer; Maamoul; Macaron; Macaroon; Melaço; Bolo lunar; Aveia; Manteiga de amendoim; Proteico; Torrada; Sablé; Recheado; Shortbread; Snickerdoodle; Bola de neve; Spritz; Açúcar; Thumbprint; Wafer; Outro
pt-PT: Variedade de bolachas: Anzac; Biscotti (cantuccini); Bolacha brownie; Manteiga; Pepitas de chocolate; Meia-lua; Digestiva; Florentina; Sorte; Pão de especiarias; Amamentação; Linzer; Maamoul; Macaron; Macaroon; Melaço; Bolo da lua; Aveia; Manteiga de amendoim; Proteína; Tosta; Sablé; Sanduíche; Shortbread; Snickerdoodle; Bola de neve; Spritz; Açúcar; Thumbprint; Wafer; Outra
fi: Pikkuleipälajike: Anzac; Biscotti (cantuccini); Browniekeksi; Voikeksi; Suklaahippu; Puolikuu; Digestive; Florentine; Onnenkeksi; Piparkakku; Imetyskeksi; Linzer; Maamoul; Macaron; Macaroon; Melassikeksi; Kuukakku; Kaurakeksi; Maapähkinävoi; Proteiinikeksi; Korppu; Sablé; Täytekeksi; Shortbread; Snickerdoodle; Lumipallo; Pursotinkeksi; Sokerikeksi; Peukalojälkikeksi; Vohveli; Muu
sl-SI: Slog piškota: Anzac; Biskviti (cantuccini); Brownie piškot; Masleni; S koščki čokolade; Rogljički; Digestive; Florentinci; Piškoti sreče; Medenjaki; Za dojenje; Linški; Maamoul; Makroni (Macaron); Kokosovi poljubčki; Z melaso; Mesečevo pecivo; Ovseni; Z arašidovim maslom; Proteinski; Prepečenec; Sablé; Sendvič piškoti; Krhki piškoti (Shortbread); Snickerdoodle; Snežene kepe; Brizgani; Sladkorni; S sredinsko vdolbino (Thumbprint); Napolitanke; Drugo
bg-BG: Разнообразие от бисквитки: Анзак; Бискоти (кантучини); Брауни; Маслени; С парченца шоколад; Полумесеци; Дайджестив; Флорентини; С късметче; Джинджифилови; За кърмачки; Линцер; Маамул; Макарони (френски); Кокосови макарони; С меласа; Лунни сладкиши; Овесени; С фъстъчено масло; Протеинови; Сухари; Сабле; Слепени; Шортбред; Сникърдудъл; Снежни топки; Шприцовани; Захарни; Тъмбпринт (с вдлъбнатина); Вафли; Други
ja: Cookieの種類: アンザック; ビスコッティ (カントゥッチーニ); ブラウニークッキー; バター; チョコチップ; クレセント; ダイジェスティブ; フロランタン; フォーチュン; ジンジャーブレッド; ラクテーション; リンツァー; マアムール; マカロン; マカルーン; モラセス; 月餅; オートミール; ピーナッツバター; プロテイン; ラスク; サブレ; サンドイッチ; ショートブレッド; スニッカードゥードル; スノーボール; スプリッツ; シュガー; サムプリント; ウエハース; その他
sv: Kaksort: Anzac; Biscotti (cantuccini); Browniekaka; Smör; Chocolate chip; Halvmånekaka; Digestive; Florentin; Lyckokaka; Pepparkaka; Amningskaka; Linzerkaka; Maamoul; Macaron; Makron; Melasskaka; Månkaka; Havre; Jordnötssmör; Protein; Skorpa; Sablé; Dubbelkaka; Mördeg; Snickerdoodle; Snöboll; Spritskaka; Socker; Hallongrotta; Rån; Annan
it: varietà di biscotti: Anzac; Cantuccini (biscotti); Biscotto brownie; Al burro; Con gocce di cioccolato; A mezzaluna; Digestive; Fiorentini; Biscotto della fortuna; Pan di zenzero; Per l’allattamento; Linzer; Maamoul; Macaron; Macaroon; Alla melassa; Mooncake; All’avena; Al burro di arachidi; Proteico; Fette biscottate; Sablé; Sandwich; Frollino; Snickerdoodle; Snowball; Spritz; Allo zucchero; Thumbprint; Wafer; Altro
hr-HR: Vrsta kolačića: Anzac; Biscotti (cantuccini); Brownie kolačić; Od maslaca; S komadićima čokolade; Kiflice; Digestive; Florentinski; Kolačić sudbine; Medenjak; Za dojilje; Linzer; Maamoul; Macaron; Macaroon; S melasom; Mjesečev kolačić (Mooncake); Od zobenih pahuljica; Od kikiriki maslaca; Proteinski; Dvopek; Sablé; Sendvič kolačić; Shortbread; Snickerdoodle; Grudice; Spritz; Šećerni; Thumbprint; Vafel; Ostalo
el: Ποικιλία μπισκότων: Anzac; Μπισκότι (Καντουτσίνι); Μπισκότο μπράουνι; Βουτύρου; Με κομμάτια σοκολάτας; Σε σχήμα μισοφέγγαρου; Digestive; Φλωρεντίνες; Fortune cookie; Τζίντζερμπρεντ; Θηλασμού; Linzer; Μααμούλ; Μακαρόν; Μακαρούν; Μελάσας; Mooncake; Βρώμης; Φυστικοβούτυρου; Πρωτεΐνης; Παξιμάδι; Sablé; Τύπου σάντουιτς; Shortbread; Snickerdoodle; Snowball; Spritz; Ζάχαρης; Thumbprint; Γκοφρέτα; Άλλο